Washington statutes.
RCW 9.98.020

Loss of jurisdiction and failure of indictment, information, complaint—Dismissal.

In the event that the action is not brought to trial within the period of time as herein provided, no court of this state shall any longer have jurisdiction thereof, nor shall the untried indictment, information or complaint be of any further force or effect, and the court shall enter an order dismissing the same with prejudice.

[ 1959 c 56 s 2.]